Hawaii statutes.
§431:4F-103 Authorization of entry.
(a) An alien insurer may use this State as a state of entry to transact
insurance in the United States through a United States branch by:

(1) Qualifying as an insurer licensed to do business
in this State; and

(2) Establishing trust accounts, pursuant to trust
agreements approved by the commissioner with a United States financial
institution approved by the commissioner, in an amount at least equal to the
minimum capital and surplus or authorized control level risk-based capital,
whichever is greater, required to be maintained by a domestic insurer licensed
for the same kind of insurance.

(b) Before authorizing the entry of a United
States branch of any alien insurer through this State, the commissioner shall
in addition to the requirements of section 431:4F-105 and any other requirement
of this chapter, require the alien insurer to:

(1) Comply with the requirements of section
431:3-212;

(2) Submit an English language translation, as
necessary, of any of the documents required in paragraph (1); and

(3) Submit to an examination of the insurer's affairs
at its principal office within the United States. [L 2004, c 120, pt of §2; am
L 2010, c 116, §1(4)]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next